Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1404
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act:

(1) Commission means the Public Service Commission;

(2) Major oil pipeline means a pipeline which is larger than
six inches in inside diameter and which is constructed in Nebraska for the
transportation of petroleum, or petroleum components, products, or wastes,
including crude oil or any fraction of crude oil, within, through, or across
Nebraska, but does not include in-field and gathering lines; and

(3) Pipeline carrier means a person that engages in owning,
operating, or managing a major oil pipeline.

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB1161, § 5.